Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2216
Board; rules and regulations; powers and duties; enumerated.

In addition to the duties listed in sections 38-126 and 38-161, the board shall:

(1) Adopt reasonable and uniform standards for nursing practice and nursing education;

(2) If requested, issue or decline to issue advisory opinions defining acts which in the opinion of the board are or are not permitted in the practice of nursing. Such opinions shall be considered informational only and are nonbinding. Practice-related information provided by the board to registered nurses or licensed practical nurses licensed under the Nurse Practice Act shall be made available by the board on request to nurses practicing in this state under a license issued by a state that is a party to the Nurse Licensure Compact;

(3) Establish rules and regulations for approving and classifying programs preparing nurses, taking into consideration administrative and organizational patterns, the curriculum, students, student services, faculty, and instructional resources and facilities, and provide surveys for each educational program as determined by the board;

(4) Approve educational programs which meet the requirements of the Nurse Practice Act;

(5) Keep a record of all its proceedings and compile an annual report for distribution;

(6) Adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for delegation of nursing activities, including training or experience requirements, competency determination, and nursing supervision;

(7) Collect data regarding nursing;

(8) Provide consultation and conduct conferences, forums, studies, and research on nursing practice and education;

(9) Join organizations that develop and regulate the national nursing licensure examinations and exclusively promote the improvement of the legal standards of the practice of nursing for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare;

(10) Administer the Nurse Licensure Compact. In reporting information to the coordinated licensure information system under Article VII of the compact, the department may disclose personal identifying information about a nurse, including his or her social security number;

(11) Establish standards for integrated practice agreements between collaborating physicians and certified nurse midwives;

(12) Monitor the scope of practice by certified nurse midwives, certified registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse practitioners;

(13) Recommend disciplinary action relating to licenses of advanced practice registered nurses, certified nurse midwives, certified registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse practitioners;

(14) Engage in other activities not inconsistent with the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act; and

(15) Adopt rules and regulations to implement the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act, for promulgation by the department as provided in section 38-126. Such rules and regulations shall also include (a) approved certification organizations and certification programs and (b) professional liability insurance.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 5, p. 839;

Laws 1959, c. 310, § 3, p. 1172;

Laws 1965, c. 414, § 1, p. 1322;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 6;

Laws 1976, LB 692, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 24;

Laws 1978, LB 658, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 19;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 36;

Laws 2000, LB 523, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 17;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 27;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,132.11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 772;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 70;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 14.
July 1, 2026
Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.

Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, see section 38-601.

Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, see section 38-701.

Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, see section 38-901.

Nurse Practitioner Practice Act, section 38-2301.